South Dakota, session 2026, HB1075.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 11-9:
At least ten days prior to the adoption of a resolution to establish a district, the
governing body shall provide written notice to each owner of property located within the
boundaries of the district, as described in the resolution required by § 11-9-5.
The notice must state that the owner's property is located within the proposed
district, and the date on which the district is to be established.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.